Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.055

Failure to notify one-number locator service—Civil penalty, if damages.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5627-S.SL) ***

(1)(a) Any excavator who fails to notify a one-number locator service and causes damage to a hazardous liquid or gas underground facility is subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for each violation.

(b) The civil penalty in this subsection may also be imposed on any excavator who violates RCW 19.122.090.

(2) All civil penalties recovered under this section must be deposited into the damage prevention account created in RCW 19.122.160.

[ 2011 c 263 s 10; 2005 c 448 s 3; 2001 c 238 s 5; 2000 c 191 s 24.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.

Intent—Finding—Effective date—2001 c 238: See notes following RCW 80.24.060.

Intent—Findings—Conflict with federal requirements—Short title—Effective date—2000 c 191: See RCW 81.88.005 and 81.88.900 through 81.88.902.